src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [milleginagi, miskinagi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ess: millenagi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: [millegina, miskina]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: miskigi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Gen: millegi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/NotNorm: miski
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegissegi, miskissegi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ill: millessegi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: [millegisse, miskisse]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegiski, miskiski] 
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ine: milleski
    miski+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: [millegis, miskis]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: miskitki
    miski+Pron+Sg+Par: midagi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/NotNorm: miskit
    miski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [millegikski, miskikski]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Tra: millekski
    miski+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: [millegiks, miskiks]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: [milleginigi, miskinigi]
    miski+Pron+Sg+Trm: millenigi
    miski+Pron+Sg+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: [millegini, miskini]
    mis+Pron+Pl+Abe: milledeta
    mis+Pron+Pl+Abl: milledelt
    mis+Pron+Pl+Ade: milledel
    mis+Pron+Pl+All: milledele
    mis+Pron+Pl+Com: milledega
    mis+Pron+Pl+Ela: milledest
    mis+Pron+Pl+Ess: milledena
    mis+Pron+Pl+Gen: millede
    mis+Pron+Pl+Ill: milledesse
    mis+Pron+Pl+Ine: milledes
    mis+Pron+Pl+Tra: milledeks
    mis+Pron+Pl+Trm: milledeni
    mis+Pron+Sg+Abe: milleta
    mis+Pron+Sg+Abl: millelt
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ade: millel
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: mil
    mis+Pron+Sg+All: millele
    mis+Pron+Sg+Com: millega
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ela: millest
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ess: millena
    mis+Pron+Sg+Gen: mille
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ill: millesse
    mis+Pron+Sg+Ine: milles
    mis+Pron+Sg+Nom: mis
    mis+Pron+Sg+Par: mida
    mis+Pron+Sg+Tra: milleks
    mis+Pron+Sg+Trm: milleni
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: mõnedetagi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõnedeta
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: mõnedeltki
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Abl: mõnedelt
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: mõnedelgi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ade: mõnedel
    mõni+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: mõnedelegi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+All: mõnedele
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: mõnedegagi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Com: mõnedega
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: mõnedestki
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ela: mõnedest
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: mõnedenagi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõnedena
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: mõnedegi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõnede
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: mõnedessegi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ill: mõnedesse
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: mõnedeski
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Ine: mõnedes
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: mõnedki
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõned
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: mõnesidki
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Par: mõnesid
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: mõnedekski
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Tra: mõnedeks
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: mõnedenigi
    mõni+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõnedeni
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: mõnetagi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõneta
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: mõneltki
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõnelt
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: mõnelgi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõnel
    mõni+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: mõnelegi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+All: mõnele
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: mõnegagi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Com: mõnega
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: mõnestki
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõnest
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: mõnenagi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõnena
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: mõnegi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõne
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: mõndagi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: mõnessegi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill: mõnda
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: mõnesse
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: mõneski
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõnes
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: mõnigi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõni
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: mõndagi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: mõndki
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Par: mõnda
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: mõnd
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: mõnekski
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõneks
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: mõnenigi
    mõni+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõneni
    see+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
    see+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
    see+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nendeltki
    see+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neiltki
    see+Pron+Pl+Abl: nendelt
    see+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: neilt
    see+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nendelgi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilgi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ade: nendel
    see+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: neil
    see+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nendelegi
    see+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilegi
    see+Pron+Pl+All: nendele
    see+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: neile
    see+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
    see+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
    see+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nendestki
    see+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neistki
    see+Pron+Pl+Ela: nendest
    see+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: neist
    see+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
    see+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
    see+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nendegi
    see+Pron+Pl+Gen: nende
    see+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nendessegi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neissegi
    see+Pron+Pl+Ill: nendesse
    see+Pron+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: neisse
    see+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nendeski
    see+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neiski
    see+Pron+Pl+Ine: nendes
    see+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: neis
    see+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: needki
    see+Pron+Pl+Nom: need
    see+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: neidki
    see+Pron+Pl+Par: neid
    see+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nendekski
    see+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neikski
    see+Pron+Pl+Tra: nendeks
    see+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: neiks
    see+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
    see+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
    see+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
    see+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nendetagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nendeltki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neiltki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl: nendelt
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: neilt
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nendelgi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilgi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade: nendel
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: neil
    nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nendelegi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neilegi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+All: nendele
    nemad+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: neile
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nendegagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nendestki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neistki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela: nendest
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: neist
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nendenagi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nendegi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Gen: nende
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nendessegi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neissegi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill: nendesse
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: neisse
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nendeski
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neiski
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine: nendes
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: neis
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Emph: nemad
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: nemadki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: nadki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Nom: nad
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: neidki
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Par: neid
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nendekski
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: neikski
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra: nendeks
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: neiks
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nendenigi
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
    nemad+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
    too+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nondetagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: nondetagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondeta
    too+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondeta
    too+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: nondeltki
    too+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noiltki
    too+Pron+Pl+Abl: nondelt
    too+Pron+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: noilt
    too+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: nondelgi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noilgi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ade: nondel
    too+Pron+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: noil
    too+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: nondelegi
    too+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noilegi
    too+Pron+Pl+All: nondele
    too+Pron+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: noile
    too+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nondegagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nondegagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Com: nondega
    too+Pron+Pl+Com: nondega
    too+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: nondestki
    too+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noistki
    too+Pron+Pl+Ela: nondest
    too+Pron+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: noist
    too+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nondenagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: nondenagi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondena
    too+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondena
    too+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nondegi
    too+Pron+Pl+Gen: nonde
    too+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: nondessegi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noissegi
    too+Pron+Pl+Ill: nondesse
    too+Pron+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: noisse
    too+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: nondeski
    too+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noiski
    too+Pron+Pl+Ine: nondes
    too+Pron+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: nois
    too+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: noodki
    too+Pron+Pl+Nom: nood
    too+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: noidki
    too+Pron+Pl+Par: noid
    too+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nondekski
    too+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: noikski
    too+Pron+Pl+Tra: nondeks
    too+Pron+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: noiks
    too+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nondenigi
    too+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nondenigi
    too+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondeni
    too+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondeni
    omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: omaenestegi
    omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: omaendigi
    omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen: omaeneste
    omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Usage/Rare: omaendi
    omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: omaendagi
    omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: omaenesegi
    omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen: omaenda
    omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Usage/Rare: omaenese
    see+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: selletagi
    see+Pron+Sg+Abe: selleta
    see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: selleltki
    see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: seltki
    see+Pron+Sg+Abl: sellelt
    see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Usage/Rare: selt
    see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sellelgi
    see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: selgi
    see+Pron+Sg+Ade: sellel
    see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: sel
    see+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sellelegi
    see+Pron+Sg+All: sellele
    see+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: sellegagi
    see+Pron+Sg+Com: sellega
    see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sellestki
    see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sestki
    see+Pron+Sg+Ela: sellest
    see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/Rare: sest
    see+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sellenagi
    see+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellena
    see+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: sellegi
    see+Pron+Sg+Gen: selle
    see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sellessegi
    see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sessegi
    see+Pron+Sg+Ill: sellesse
    see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: sesse
    see+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: selleski
    see+Pron+Sg+Ine: selles
    see+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare: ses
    see+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: seegi
    see+Pron+Sg+Nom: see
    see+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sedagi
    see+Pron+Sg+Par: seda
    see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sellekski
    see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sekski
    see+Pron+Sg+Tra: selleks
    see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Usage/Rare: seks
    see+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sellenigi
    see+Pron+Sg+Trm: selleni
    sina+Pron+Sg+Com+Emph: sinuga
    sina+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Emph: sinugagi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: sinutagi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abe: sinuta
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Emph: sinult
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Emph: sinultki
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: sultki
    sina+Pron+Sg+Abl: sult
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Emph: sinul
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Emph: sinulgi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sulgi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ade: sul
    sina+Pron+Sg+All+Emph: sinule
    sina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Emph: sinulegi
    sina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sullegi
    sina+Pron+Sg+All: sulle
    sina+Pron+Sg+Com: suga
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Emph: sinust
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Emph: sinustki
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sustki
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ela: sust
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sinunagi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ess: sinuna
